Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the  biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Agency administration..............  $ 3,266,428
(2) Fire protection..........................  $ 52,126,056
(3) Private forests ..........................  $ 17,381,378
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 18,959,910
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from the United States Forest Service for fire  protection and for re-
search projects, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in this section,
collected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration .............. $ 36,167,602
(2) Fire protection .......................... $ 76,617,864
(3) State forests ............................. $106,777,017
(4) Private forests .......................... $ 12,992,807
(5) Capital improvement................. $ 4,783,787
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 517,590
(7) Equipment pool......................... $ 17,769,354
(8) Facilities maintenance
and management ....................... $ 5,642,715
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,605,450 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Forestry Department for debt  service relating to the
purchase of land in the Gilchrist Forest.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2019 Act, col-
lected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Agency administration .............. $ 2,809,548
(2) Fire protection .......................... $ 17,756,258
(3) State forests ............................. $ 909,460
(4) Private forests .......................... $ 14,085,636
SECTION 5. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the following amounts, to be allocated to  the State Forestry Department for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(a) Severity resource expenses ....... $ 4,000,000
(b) Catastrophic wildfire
insurance premium expenses .... $ 2,000,000
(c) Supplemental fire program
personnel costs due to
extended fire seasons ................ $ 2,000,000
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount  of $3,201,253 for catastrophic wildfire insurance premium costs for
the 2019 fire season.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  592, Oregon Laws 2017, collected
or received by the State Forestry  Department, for fire protection, is increased by $532,747
for catastrophic wildfire insurance premium costs for the 2019 fire season.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 3